Oklahoma, session 2025, SB735.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


This act shall be known as and may be cited as the “Voter Roll


Integrity and Maintenance Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4-122 of Title 26, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. 1. The Secretary of the State Election Board shall prepare


and submit an annual report, as provided for in subsection B of this


section, to the Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate,

Req. No. 1393 Page 1


and the Speaker of the House of Representatives no later than


January 31 of each year.


2. Each secretary of a county election board shall prepare and


submit an annual report, as provided for in subsection B of this


section, to the Secretary of the State Election Board no later than


January 15 of each year.


B. 1. The reports required in subsection A of this section


shall include the following information:


a. a summary of efforts undertaken during the preceding


calendar year to prevent non-citizens from being added


to the voter rolls,


b. actions taken to remove any identified non-citizens or


other ineligible persons from the voter rolls,


including the total number of removed individuals and


reasons for removal,


c. any coordination or collaboration with federal, state,


and local agencies to verify voter eligibility, and


d. an analysis of the efficacy of current voter


registration maintenance processes and any


recommendations for improvements.


2. The report of the Secretary of the State Election Board shall


include aggregated statewide data as well as a summary of county-


level reports.



Req. No. 1393 Page 2


C. The Secretary shall publish the statewide report on the


official state website within thirty (30) days of submission to the


Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker


of the House of Representatives, to ensure public transparency.


D. Failure by the secretary of a county election board to


submit the required report by the specified deadline shall result in


notification from the Secretary, providing a fourteen-day grace


period for compliance. Repeated failure to comply with the


provisions of this act shall result in a written referral to the


Secretary for review and potential disciplinary action as deemed


appropriate by the Secretary.


E. The Legislature shall retain exclusive authority to


establish statutes necessary for implementation of the provisions of


this act. The Secretary of State may promulgate rules necessary to


implement the requirements of this section and submit to the


legislature for approval as required by law.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1393 TEK 1/19/2025 5:42:15 AM











Req. No. 1393 Page 3